Connecticut, session 2026, HB05560.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioners of
Developmental Services and Social Services shall evaluate and share
with each other rates of payment each pay to nonprofit provider
organizations for the same services. To the extent such rates are lower
for the same services at the Department of Developmental Services or
the Department of Social Services, the commissioner paying such lower
rates shall increase such rates to achieve payment parity.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2026, the commissioners shall file a joint
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, with the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to human services and public
health. The report shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) A list of
services provided by nonprofit organizations by contract with each
department, (2) rates of payment by each department for each such
LCO No. 2732 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5560
service before any rate increase pursuant to this section, (3) costs to the
state to increase such rates to achieve payment parity, and (4) costs to
the state if the departments provided such services instead of
contracting with a nonprofit provider to provide the services.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section